California statutes. Business and Professions Code
All accusations against licensees shall be filed within three years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, except that with respect to an accusation alleging a violation of subdivision (d) of Section 9889.3, the accusation may be filed within two years after the discovery by the bureau of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 357, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.9.

When any license has been revoked or suspended following a hearing under the provisions of this article, any additional license issued under Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) in the name of the licensee may be likewise revoked or suspended by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 26.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.10.

After suspension of the license upon any of the grounds set forth in this article, the director may reinstate the license upon proof of compliance by the applicant with all provisions of the decision as to reinstatement. After revocation of a license upon any of the grounds set forth in this article, the license shall not be reinstated or reissued within a period of one year after the effective date of revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Lamp and Brake Adjustment Certificates [9889.15. - 9889.19.1.]

9889.15.

As used in this article, “station,” “licensed station,” and “licensed adjuster” have the same meaning as defined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 9888.1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 9.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9889.19.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.16.

Whenever a licensed adjuster in a licensed station upon an inspection or after an adjustment, made in conformity with the instructions of the bureau, determines that the lamps or the brakes upon any vehicle conform with the requirements of the Vehicle Code, the adjuster shall, when requested by the owner or driver of the vehicle, issue a certificate of adjustment on a form prescribed by the director, which certificate shall contain the date of issuance, the make and registration number of the vehicle, the name of the owner of the vehicle, and the official license of the station.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 15.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9889.19.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.19.

The director may charge a fee for lamp and brake adjustment certificates furnished to licensed stations. The fee charged shall be established by regulation and shall not produce a total estimated revenue which, together with license fees or certification fees charged pursuant to Sections 9886.3, 9887.2, and 9887.3, is in excess of the estimated total cost to the bureau of the administration of this chapter. The fee charged by licensed stations for lamp and brake adjustment certificates shall be the same amount the director charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 12.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9889.19.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.19.1.

This article shall remain operative only until six months after the effective date of the regulations adopted by the director pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 10.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 8, commencing with Section 9889.15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Penalties [9889.20. - 9889.22.]

9889.20.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 9889.21, any person who fails to comply in any respect with the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 20.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.21.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 9887.1), Article 6 (commencing with Section 9888.1), Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 9889.1) of this chapter is guilty of an infraction and punishable as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 42001 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) This section shall remain operative only until six months after the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 372, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 11.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 12 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.21.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 9889.1) of this chapter is guilty of an infraction and punishable as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 42001 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) This section shall become operative six months after the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 372, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 12.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.22.

The willful making of any false statement or entry with regard to a material matter in any oath, affidavit, certificate of compliance or noncompliance, or application form which is required by this chapter or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code constitutes perjury and is punishable as provided in the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 951, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Used Tires [9889.30. - 9889.30.]

9889.30.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), an automotive repair dealer shall not install an unsafe used tire on a motor vehicle for use on a highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “unsafe used tire” means a used tire to which any of the following criteria applies:

(A) The tire is worn to two thirty-seconds of one inch tread depth or less on any area of the tread.

(B) The tire has any damage exposing the reinforcing plies of the tire,
 through cuts, cracks, punctures, scrapes, or wear.

(C) The tire has any repair in the tread shoulder or belt edge area.

(D) The tire has a puncture that has not been both sealed or patched on the inside and repaired with a cured rubber stem through to the outside.

(E) The tire has repair to the sidewall or bead area.

(F) The tire has a puncture repair of damage larger than one-fourth of one inch.

(G) The tire shows evidence of prior use of a temporary tire sealant to repair a puncture or damage to the tire without evidence of a subsequent proper repair.

(H) The tire has a defaced or removed United States Department of Transportation tire identification number.

(I) The tire has any inner liner damage or bead damage.

(J) The tire shows indication of internal separation, such as bulges or local areas of irregular tread wear indicating a distortion in the tread area when compared to other areas of the tread, or belt separation.

(b) This section does not apply to
 tire repairs, tire rotations, tire balancing, or a tire mounted on a wheel or rim that is temporarily removed from a vehicle and reinstalled on the same vehicle. As used in this subdivision, “tire repair” means repairing a puncture in the tire tread area that is no larger than one-fourth of one inch in diameter, has not caused any internal damage to the tire, and is repaired according to industry standards.

(c) Except as set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), an automotive repair dealer shall use a visual inspection to determine whether a tire meets the criteria
 of an unsafe used tire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   (AB 949)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Auto Body Repair [9889.50. - 9889.53.]

9889.50.

The Legislature finds the following:

(1) Thousands of California automobile owners each year require repair of their vehicles as a result of collision or other damage.

(2) California automobile owners are suffering direct and indirect harm through unsafe, improper, incompetent, and fraudulent auto body repairs.

(3) There is a lack of proper training and equipment that auto body repair shops need to meet the demands of the highly evolved and sophisticated automobile manufacturing industry.

(4) California has no minimum standards or requirements for auto body repair shops.

(5) Existing laws currently regulating the auto body industry could be strengthened.

(6) There is a compelling need to increase competency and standards for the auto body repair industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 445, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.51.

“Auto body repair shop” means a place of business operated by an automotive repair dealer where automotive collision repair or reconstruction of automobile or truck bodies is performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 445, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.52.

An application for registration pursuant to Section 9884 shall designate that the applicant is registering as an auto body repair shop if the applicant intends to perform auto body repair. In addition, an application for registration to operate an auto body repair shop shall include a written statement signed under penalty of perjury that the applicant has been issued licenses or permits, if required by law, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A city or county business license.

(2) A State Board of Equalization identification or resale permit number.

(3) An Environmental Protection Agency hazardous waste permit number.

(4) An Air Quality Management District spray booth permit number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 445, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.53.

A check or draft issued to a repairer pursuant to Section 560 of the Insurance Code shall include the repairer’s registration number or taxpayer identification number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 445, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Auto Body Repair Study [9889.66. - 9889.68.]

9889.66.

The form for registration pursuant to Section 9884 shall contain sufficient information to enable the Bureau of Automotive Repair to identify all registrants performing automotive collision repair work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 479, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.68.

Any auto insurance company check or draft issued to a repairer pursuant to Insurance Code Section 560 shall include the repairer’s registration number or Tax Payer Identification Number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 479, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 21.5. Foreign Labor Contractors [9998. - 9998.12.]

9998.

This chapter shall apply only to the following:

(a) Nonagricultural workers under the federal H-2B visa program established pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b)).

(b) On and after July 1, 2027, agricultural workers under the federal H-2A visa program established pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a)).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 3.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.1.

The following definitions are applicable to this chapter:

(a) “Person” includes any natural person, company, firm, partnership or joint venture, association, corporation, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship.

(b) “Foreign labor contracting activity” means recruiting or soliciting for compensation a foreign worker who resides outside of the United States in furtherance of that worker’s employment in California, including when that activity occurs wholly outside the United States. “Foreign labor contracting activity” does not include the services of an employer, or employee of an employer, if those services are provided directly to foreign workers solely to find workers for the employer’s own use.

(c) “Foreign worker” means any person seeking employment who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident but who is authorized by the federal government to work in the United States, including a person who engages in temporary nonagricultural labor pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b)). “Foreign worker” shall also include any worker described in Section 9998.

(d) “Foreign labor contractor” means any person who performs foreign labor contracting activity, including any person who performs foreign labor contracting activity wholly outside the United States, except that the term does not include any entity of federal, state, or local government. “Foreign labor contractor” does not include a person licensed by the Labor Commissioner as a talent agency under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 1700) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, or a person who obtained and maintains full written designation from the United States Department of State under Part 62 of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 4.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.1.5.

(a) (1) On and after July 1, 2016, a person acting as a foreign labor contractor shall register with the Labor Commissioner in accordance with the terms and procedures for registration established by the commissioner by January 1, 2016.

(2) On and after July 1, 2027, a person who is licensed or acting as a farm labor contractor pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1682) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and who performs foreign labor contracting activities shall register with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to the terms and procedures for registration described in paragraph (1).

(3) In registering a person already licensed as a farm labor contractor pursuant
 to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1682) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code as a foreign labor contractor pursuant to paragraph (2), the Labor Commissioner has discretion, to the extent feasible for the efficient administration of the program, to eliminate duplicative application information requirements for information previously obtained from the farm labor contractor’s license application if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The applicant provides their farm labor contractor license number.

(B) The applicant attests that there are no changes to the information previously provided to the Labor Commissioner.

(4) The commissioner shall post on its internet website the names and contact information for all registered foreign labor contractors and a list of the names and contact information for
 any foreign labor contractors denied renewal or registration.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may not register a person to act as a foreign labor contractor, and may not renew a registration, until all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person has executed a written application in a form prescribed by the commissioner, subscribed and sworn to by the person, and containing all of the following:

(A) A statement by the person of all facts required by the commissioner concerning the applicant’s character, competency, responsibility, and the manner and means by which the person proposes to conduct operations as a foreign labor contractor if registered.

(B) The names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries,
 financially interested, either as partners, associates, or profit sharers, in the proposed operation as a foreign labor contractor, together with the amount of their respective interests.

(C) A declaration consenting to the designation by a court or the commissioner as an agent available to accept service of summons in any action against the registrant, if the registrant has left the jurisdiction in which the action is commenced or otherwise has become unavailable to accept service.

(D) On and after July 1, 2027, a listing of each federal visa program under which the person will be performing foreign labor contractor activities.

(2) The commissioner, after investigation, is satisfied as to the character, competency, and responsibility of the person.

(3) (A) The person has deposited with the commissioner a surety bond in an amount based on the size of the person’s annual gross receipts from operations as a foreign labor contractor, as follows:

(i) For gross receipts up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), a fifty-thousand-dollar ($50,000) bond.

(ii) For gross receipts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to two million dollars ($2,000,000), a one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) bond.

(iii) For gross receipts greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000), a one-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar ($150,000) bond.

(B) If the foreign labor contractor has been the subject of a final judgment in a year in an amount equal to that of the bond required, that
 contractor shall be required to deposit an additional bond within 60 days. The bond shall be payable to the people of the State of California and shall be conditioned on the foreign labor contractor complying with all the terms and provisions of this chapter and paying all damages occasioned to any person by failure to do so, or by any violation of this chapter, or false statements or misrepresentations made in the registration process. The bond shall also be payable for interest on wages and for any damages arising from violation of applicable orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and for any other monetary relief awarded to a foreign worker as a result of a violation of law by the foreign labor contractor.

(4) The person has paid to the commissioner a registration fee and a filing fee in a total amount the commissioner determines is sufficient to support the ongoing costs of the program.

(c) The commissioner may not register a person as a foreign labor contractor, if the person was found by a court, the Secretary of Labor, or the commissioner to have violated any of the following provisions:

(1) The federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (Division A, Public Law 106-386), as amended.

(2) Sections 1682 to 1699, inclusive, of the Labor Code.

(3) Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(4) An applicable guest worker program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.2.

(a) On and after July 1, 2016, a person who knows or should have known that the person is using the services of a foreign labor contractor to procure foreign workers or employees pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9998.1 shall disclose this information to the Labor Commissioner in accordance with the terms and procedures established by the commissioner by January 1, 2016.

(b) The disclosure shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The name, address, and contact information of the person designated by the employer to work with a foreign labor contractor.

(2) A declaration consenting to the designation by a court of the commissioner as an agent available to accept service of summons in any action against the person, if the person has left the jurisdiction in which the action is commenced or otherwise has become unavailable to accept service.

 (c) A person may not knowingly enter into an agreement for the services of a foreign labor contractor that is not registered under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 711, Sec. 5.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.2.5.

(a) A foreign labor contractor shall ascertain and disclose in writing to each foreign worker who is recruited for employment in English and in the primary language of the foreign worker being recruited, at the time of the foreign worker’s recruitment, the following information:

(1) The identity of the employer and the identity of the person conducting the recruiting on behalf of the employer, including any subcontractor or agent involved in the recruiting.

(2) A signed copy of the work contract, including all assurances and terms and conditions of employment, from the prospective employer for whom the foreign worker is being recruited,
 including the compensation to be paid, the place and period of employment, a description of the type and nature of employment activities, any withholdings or deductions from compensation, and any penalties for terminating employment.

(3) The type of visa under which the foreign worker is to be employed, the length of time the visa is valid, and the terms and conditions under which the visa will be renewed with a clear statement of whether the employer will secure renewal of the visa or if renewal must be obtained by the foreign worker, and any expenses associated with securing or renewing the visa.

(4) An itemized list of any costs or expenses to be charged to the foreign worker, including, but not limited to, the costs of housing or accommodation, transportation to and from the worksite, meals, medical examinations, health care or safety equipment costs, and any other costs,
 expenses, or deductions to be charged the foreign worker.

(5) A statement, in a form specified by the Labor Commissioner, that does each of the following:

(A) States that no foreign labor contractor, or agent or employee of a foreign labor contractor, can lawfully assess any fee, including visa fees, processing fees, transportation fees, legal expenses, placement fees, and other costs to a foreign worker for foreign labor contracting activities, and that the employer may bear the costs or fees for the foreign labor contractor, but that these fees cannot be assessed to the foreign worker.

(B) Explains that no additional requirements or changes may be made to the terms of the contract originally provided by the foreign labor contractor and signed by the foreign worker, unless the foreign worker is provided at least 48
 hours to review and consider the additional requirements or changes and the foreign worker gives specific consent, voluntarily and without threat of penalty, to each additional requirement or change.

(C) Describes the protections afforded the foreign worker by this chapter and by the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (Division A, Public Law 106-386), as amended, and any applicable guest worker program, including relevant information about the procedure for filing a complaint under this chapter, and the telephone number for the national human trafficking resource center hotline.

(6) Any education or training to be provided or required, including the nature, timing, and cost of training and the person who will pay training costs, whether the training is a condition of employment, continued employment, or future employment, and whether the foreign worker will be paid
 or remunerated during the training period, including the rate of pay or remuneration.

(b) The foreign labor contractor shall file the disclosure required under subdivision (a) with the Labor Commissioner within seven business days of providing it to the foreign worker.

(c) A foreign labor contractor, or the agent, subcontractor, or employee of a foreign labor contractor, or a person using the services of a foreign labor contractor to obtain foreign workers or employees, may not assess any fee, including, but not limited to, visa fees, processing fees, transportation fees, legal expenses, placement fees, and other costs, to a foreign worker for foreign labor contracting activities.

(d) A foreign worker may not be required to pay any costs or expenses that are not customarily assessed against
 all workers similarly employed in the United States. No costs or expenses shall be required to be paid by the foreign worker prior to the commencement of work. The amount charged for providing housing to the foreign worker shall be limited to market rate for similar housing.

(e) Additional requirements or changes shall not be made to the terms of the contract originally provided by the foreign labor contractor and signed by the foreign worker, unless the foreign worker is provided at least 48 hours to review and consider the additional requirements or changes and the foreign worker gives specific consent, voluntarily and without threat of penalty, to each additional requirement or change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.3.

No foreign labor contractor shall make, publish, or circulate or cause to be made, published, or circulated, to any person any false, fraudulent, or misleading representation or information concerning the terms or conditions of employment at any place or places of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.4.

No foreign labor contractor shall recruit for employment or cause any minor who is a foreign worker to be employed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.5.

Any foreign labor contractor who recruits or solicits without a bona fide job order and who induces a foreign worker to be transported to a proposed jobsite and who does not then provide employment for the foreign worker shall pay wages to the foreign worker at the agreed rate of pay for the job to which the foreign worker was being transported and for the elapsed time from the point of recruitment to the jobsite to the point the worker returns to the place of original departure, and for any transportation costs incurred by the foreign worker in connection with the pursuit of the labor contractor’s services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.6.

A person may not intimidate, threaten, restrain, coerce, discharge, or in any manner discriminate against a foreign worker or a member of his or her family in retaliation for the foreign worker’s exercise of any right under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 711, Sec. 7.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.7.

No foreign labor contractor shall make promises or otherwise induce a foreign worker to travel or accept promises of employment by promising or providing assurances to the foreign worker that citizenship or permanent residency status in the United States shall be secured or pursued if the worker accepts the offer of services of the foreign labor contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1450, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.8.

(a) A person who violates this chapter or who causes or induces another to violate this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both. A person shall not be liable under this subdivision for any act or omission by a foreign labor contractor engaged by the person if the foreign labor contractor was registered with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 9998.1.5 no later than the first day of engagement.

(b) A person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation, in addition to any other
 civil remedies available to the Labor Commissioner or an aggrieved person.

(c) The commissioner or a person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may do all of the following:

(1) Bring an action for injunctive relief against a person who violates this chapter and, upon prevailing, recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(2) Bring an action for damages, against a person who violates this chapter to recover the greater of all of the aggrieved person’s actual damages or five hundred dollars ($500) per employee per violation for an initial violation, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) per employee for each subsequent violation, and, upon prevailing in an action brought pursuant to this section, recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(3) Enforce the liability on the bonds required under Section 9998.1.5.

(d) The Labor Commissioner may enforce the requirements of this chapter through the procedures set forth in Sections 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, and 1197.1 of the Labor Code, including the issuance of a citation or filing of a civil action against a person who violates the requirements of this chapter.

(e) A person shall not be jointly and severally liable for any act or omission by a foreign labor contractor engaged by the person if the foreign labor contractor was registered with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 9998.1.5 no later than the first day of engagement.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or alter any other rights or remedies, including any causes of action, available under any other federal or
 state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 6.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.10.

The Labor Commissioner and the deputies and representatives authorized by the commissioner in writing may take assignments of actions on the bonds required under Section 9998.1.5 by aggrieved persons and may prosecute the actions on behalf of persons who, in the judgment of the commissioner, are financially unable to employ counsel, in the same manner that claims are prosecuted under Section 98.3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 7.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.11.

The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations or policies and procedures to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9998.12.

(a) The Department of Industrial Relations shall submit to the Legislature, by January 1, 2028, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a study on how to extend foreign labor contractor registration requirements to those foreign labor contractors recruiting or soliciting workers authorized to work in the United States under visa programs not described in either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 9998. This study shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) An overview of the federal visa programs not covered by this chapter’s foreign labor contractor registration program.

(2) An analysis of the demographics of foreign workers in California authorized
 to work through the federal visa programs described in paragraph (1).

(3) A discussion of any additional steps the Labor Commissioner would need to take to ensure all foreign labor contractors are required to register pursuant to this chapter.

(4) A discussion of operational needs, including access to data, fee increases to cover costs, and enforcement options already available pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9998.8.

(5) Recommendations of options to expand this chapter’s foreign labor contractor registration program that considers the following:

(A) Risks to workers authorized to work in the United States through the visa programs described in paragraph (1).

(B) Costs and
 staffing needs to expand the registration process required for foreign labor contractors under this chapter.

(C) Enforcement costs and options, including those authorized by subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9998.8.

(D) The operational constraints described in paragraph (4).

(b) The Department of Industrial Relations may contract with a third party to conduct the study described in subdivision (a).

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 190, Sec. 8.   (AB 1362)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. REAL ESTATE [10000. - 11506.]



PART 1. LICENSING OF PERSONS [10000. - 10580.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10000. - 10035.]

10000.

This part may be cited as the Real Estate Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

Except as otherwise specified, the definitions in this chapter apply to the provisions of this part only and do not affect any other provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

“Commissioner” means the Real Estate Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 2.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

(a) “Department” means the Department of Real Estate in the Business and Consumer Services Agency.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) Whenever the terms “bureau,” “division,” “Bureau of Real Estate,” “State Real Estate Division,” or “Real Estate Division” are used in this division, they mean the Department of Real Estate.

(b) Whenever the terms “Bureau of Real Estate,” “State Real Estate Division,” or “Real Estate Division” are used in any other law, they mean the Department of Real Estate.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 828, Sec. 8.   (SB 173)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

“Person” includes corporation, company and firm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

“Provisions of this part relating to real estate” means the provisions of Chapters 1, 2, 3, and 6 of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 3.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

“Provisions of this part relating to business opportunity regulation” means the provisions of Chapters 1, 2, and 6 of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 4.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.5.

Solely with regard to any transaction involving the sale, lease, or exchange of a business opportunity occurring before, on, or after the effective date of this section, this division shall not apply to any person licensed at the time of the transaction as a securities broker or securities dealer under any law of this state or of the United States, or by any employee, officer, or agent of that person while acting under the direction of, and within the scope of, his or her employment with that person in connection with the transaction.

As used in this section, “any transaction involving the sale, lease, or exchange of a business opportunity” does not include any of the acts described in Section 10131 or Section 10131.2 if the substance of the transaction is to transfer, sell, lease, or exchange an interest in real property for the purpose of evading this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1116, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.5.

“Provisions of this part relating to mineral, oil, and gas brokerage” means the provisions of Chapters 1, 2, 6, and 7, of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 5.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

“Provisions of this part relating to hearings” means the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 6.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.5.

(a) Nothing in Assembly Bill 1289 of the 2017–18 Regular Session or Assembly Bill 2884 of the 2017–18 Regular Session shall be construed to affect any of the following:

(1) A real estate broker’s duties under existing statutory or common law as an agent of a person who retains that broker to perform acts for which a license is required under this division.

(2) Any fiduciary duties owed by a real estate broker to a person who retains that broker to perform acts for which a license is required under this division.

(3) Any duty of disclosure or any other duties or obligations of a real estate broker that arise under
 this division or other existing applicable California law, including common law.

(4) Any duties or obligations of a salesperson or a broker associate that arise under this division or existing applicable California law, including common law, including duties and obligations to the salesperson’s or broker associate’s responsible broker.

(5) A responsible broker’s duty of supervision and oversight for the acts of retained salespersons or broker associates that arise under this division or other existing applicable California law, including common law.

(b) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that a responsible broker, as defined in Section 10015.1, has the duty to supervise and oversee the licensed acts of each salesperson and broker associate affiliated with and working under his or her
 supervision, regardless of whether the retention contract with that salesperson or broker associate specifies an independent contractor relationship or an employment relationship.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that, consistent with existing statutory and common law, a responsible broker is liable for the actions or negligence of a salesperson or broker associate retained by the responsible broker to perform acts for which a license is required under this division.

(c) For purposes of this section, references to “existing statutory law” and “existing applicable California law” refer to the law as it read immediately prior to enactment of Assembly Bill 1289 of the 2017–18 Regular Session and Assembly Bill 2884 of the 2017–18 Regular Session.
